Illinois, session 104th, SB1644.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 20-15 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/20-15)7    Sec. 20-15. Information on bill or separate statement. 8There shall be printed on each bill, or on a separate slip 9which shall be mailed with the bill:10        (a) a statement itemizing the rate at which taxes have 11    been extended for each of the taxing districts in the 12    county in whose district the property is located, and in 13    those counties utilizing electronic data processing 14    equipment the dollar amount of tax due from the person 15    assessed allocable to each of those taxing districts, 16    including a separate statement of the dollar amount of tax 17    due which is allocable to a tax levied under the Illinois 18    Local Library Act or to any other tax levied by a 19    municipality or township for public library purposes,20        (b) a separate statement for each of the taxing 21    districts of the dollar amount of tax due which is 22    allocable to a tax levied under the Illinois Pension Code 23    or to any other tax levied by a municipality or township   SB1644- 2 -LRB104 04492 HLH 14519 b1    for public pension or retirement purposes,2        (b-5) a list of each tax increment financing (TIF) 3    district in which the property is located and the dollar 4    amount of tax due that is allocable to the TIF district, 5        (b-6) a statement for each tax increment financing 6    (TIF) district in which the property is located setting 7    forth the amount that each taxing district that contains 8    all or part of the TIF district would have received for the 9    taxable year in the absence of the TIF district, 10        (c) the total tax rate,11        (d) the total amount of tax due, and12        (e) the amount by which the total tax and the tax 13    allocable to each taxing district differs from the 14    taxpayer's last prior tax bill.15    The county treasurer shall ensure that only those taxing 16districts in which a parcel of property is located shall be 17listed on the bill for that property.18    In all counties the statement shall also provide:19        (1) the property index number or other suitable 20    description,21        (2) the assessment of the property,22        (3) the statutory amount of each homestead exemption 23    applied to the property, 24        (4) the assessed value of the property after 25    application of all homestead exemptions, 26        (5) the equalization factors imposed by the county and   SB1644- 3 -LRB104 04492 HLH 14519 b1    by the Department, and2        (6) the equalized assessment resulting from the 3    application of the equalization factors to the basic 4    assessment.5    In all counties which do not classify property for 6purposes of taxation, for property on which a single family 7residence is situated the statement shall also include a 8statement to reflect the fair cash value determined for the 9property. In all counties which classify property for purposes 10of taxation in accordance with Section 4 of Article IX of the 11Illinois Constitution, for parcels of residential property in 12the lowest assessment classification the statement shall also 13include a statement to reflect the fair cash value determined 14for the property.15    In all counties, the statement must include information 16that certain taxpayers may be eligible for tax exemptions, 17abatements, and other assistance programs and that, for more 18information, taxpayers should consult with the office of their 19township or county assessor and with the Department of 20Revenue. For bills mailed on or after January 1, 2026, the 21statement must include, in bold face type, a list of 22exemptions available to taxpayers and contact information for 23the chief county assessment officer. 24    In counties which use the estimated or accelerated billing 25methods, these statements shall only be provided with the 26final installment of taxes due. The provisions of this Section   SB1644- 4 -LRB104 04492 HLH 14519 b1create a mandatory statutory duty. They are not merely 2directory or discretionary. The failure or neglect of the 3collector to mail the bill, or the failure of the taxpayer to 4receive the bill, shall not affect the validity of any tax, or 5the liability for the payment of any tax.6(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.